Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. Weight Regulations
§ 1402.
Overweight, width, height, and length permits; fees.

Overweight, overwidth, indivisible overlength, and overheight permits. Overweight, overwidth, indivisible overlength, and overheight permits shall be signed by the Commissioner or by his or her agent and a copy shall be kept in the office of the Commissioner or in a location approved by the Commissioner. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a copy shall also be available in the towing vehicle and must be available for inspection on demand of a law enforcement officer. Before operating a traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle, the person to whom a permit to operate in excess of the weight, width, indivisible overlength, and height limits established by this title is granted shall pay a fee of $40.00 for each single trip permit or $112.00 for a blanket permit, except that the fee for a fleet blanket permit shall be $112.00 for the first unit and $6.00 for each unit thereafter. At the option of a carrier, an annual permit for the entire fleet, to operate over any approved route, may be obtained for $112.00 for the first tractor and $6.00 for each additional tractor, up to a maximum fee of $1,000.00. The fee for a fleet permit shall be based on the entire number of tractors owned by the applicant. An applicant for a fleet permit may apply for any number of specific routes, each of which shall be reviewed with regard to the characteristics of the route and the type of equipment operated by the applicant. When the weight or size of the vehicle-load are considered sufficiently excessive for the routing requested, the Agency of Transportation shall, on request of the Commissioner, conduct an engineering inspection of the vehicle-load and route, for which a fee of $300.00 will be added to the cost of the permit if the load is a manufactured home. For all other loads of any size or with gross weight limits less than 150,000 pounds, the fee shall be $800.00 for any engineering inspection that requires up to eight hours to conduct. If the inspection requires more than eight hours to conduct, the fee shall be $800.00 plus $60.00 per hour for each additional hour required. If the vehicle and load weigh 150,000 pounds or more but not more than 200,000 pounds, the engineering inspection fee shall be $2,000.00. If the vehicle and load weigh more than 200,000 pounds but not more than 250,000 pounds, the engineering inspection fee shall be $5,000.00. If the vehicle and load weigh more than 250,000 pounds, the engineering inspection fee shall be $10,000.00. The study must be completed prior to the permit being issued. Prior to the issuance of a permit, an applicant whose vehicle weighs 150,000 pounds or more, or is 15 or more feet in width or height, shall file with the Commissioner a special certificate of insurance showing minimum coverage of $250,000.00 for death or injury to one person, $500,000.00 for death or injury to two or more persons, and $250,000.00 for property damage, all arising out of any one crash.

Overlength permits. Except as provided in subsections 1432(c) and (e) of this title, it shall be necessary to obtain an overlength permit as follows:

For vehicles with a trailer or semitrailer longer than 75 feet, anywhere in the State on highways approved by the Agency of Transportation. In such cases, the vehicle may be operated with a single trip overlength permit issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles for a fee of $28.00. If the vehicle is 100 feet or more in length, the permit applicant shall file with the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles a special certificate of insurance showing minimum coverage of $250,000.00 for death or injury to one person, $500,000.00 for death or injury to two or more persons, and $250,000.00 for property damage, all arising out of any one crash.

[Repealed.]

Prepayment of permit fees. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may accept prepayments of fees under section 1400 of this title. A prepayment shall be credited to the account of the person making the prepayment and the account shall be reduced to the extent of any fees due from that person under this section; provided, however, fees may not be charged to the account in excess of the account balance. Upon oral application of any person having prepaid fees, the Commissioner may issue a permit with an identifying number, and the permit shall become effective immediately. Upon application, the Commissioner shall return any unused portion of the prepayment to the person originally making the prepayment.

[Repealed.]

“Low-bed” trailer permit.

The Commissioner may issue an annual permit to allow the transportation of a so-called “low-bed” trailer. A “low-bed” trailer is defined as a trailer manufactured for the primary purpose of carrying heavy equipment on a flat-surfaced deck, which deck is at a height equal to or lower than the top of the rear axle group.

A blanket permit may be obtained for an annual fee of $275.00 per unit, provided the total vehicle length does not exceed 75 feet, does not exceed a loaded width of 12´6", does not exceed a total weight of 108,000 lbs., and has a height not exceeding 14 feet.

Warning signs and flags shall be required if the vehicle exceeds 75 feet in length or exceeds 8´6" in width.

[Repealed.]

Single trip permit; duration. A single trip permit issued under this section shall be valid for seven business days.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 106

, eff. April 14, 1959;

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 25, 1970;

1987, No. 95

, § 2, eff. June 23, 1987;

1989, No. 51

, § 44;

1995, No. 47

, §§ 11, 12, eff. April 20, 1995;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 18m, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 46

, §§ 1-3;

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Aug. 1, 2000;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. March 1, 2004;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2009, No. 50

, § 52;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 56;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

2017, No. 71

, § 15, eff. June 8, 2017;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 204.

§ 1403.
Expiration or revocation.

Blanket permits shall expire at the same time as the vehicle’s registration but may be revoked for cause by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles with or without hearing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 25, 1970;

1987, No. 95

, § 1, eff. June 23, 1987;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 1404.
Bond required.

In his or her discretion, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall require the applicant to file a bond of certificate of insurance in such amount as in his or her judgment seems adequate to cover any probable damage that may be occasioned by the use and operation of such tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle, executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company authorized to transact business in this State as surety, conditional to pay all injuries or damages sustained by the State or by any municipality or person in consequence of the failure to comply with the provisions of such permit, or the excessive weight allowed by such permit, or the careless, negligent, or unlawful act of such principal or his or her agents or servants.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 25, 1970.

§ 1405.
Actions against the bond.

The State, a person, or a municipal corporation injured by any careless, negligent, or unlawful act of or failure of the principal or his or her agents or servants to comply with the provisions of such permit or on account of the injury to a highway, bridge, or culvert because of the excessive weight allowed by such permit, and, if the death of any person is caused by any careless, negligent, or unlawful act as aforesaid, the executor or administrator, shall have a right of action in the name of the obligee named in such bond for his or her, its, or their use and benefits against the principal and surety named in such bond, and may prosecute the same to final judgment and execution.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 281

, § 7.

§ 1406.
Federally owned vehicles.

In case of oilers, tractors, rollers, dump wagons, and other road machinery and trucks, tractors, and trailers owned and operated by the federal government, a permit may be issued by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
The furnishing of a bond in such cases shall be in the discretion of such Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 25, 1970.

§ 1407.
Operation of overweight vehicles.

A motor truck, truck tractor, tractor, trailer, or other vehicle, machine, or contrivance shall not be operated over the highways of the State of Vermont in violation of any provision of this title relative to the weight of the vehicle, machine, or contrivance. In a prosecution for these violations, the proper defendant shall be either the owner or lessee of the vehicle, machine, or contrivance or the person who moves or operates the vehicle, machine, or contrivance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

1995, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1408.
Operating vehicle in excess of registered capacity.

A motor truck, tractor, trailer, or other vehicle, machine, or contrivance shall not be operated or moved upon any highway with a gross weight, including load and vehicle, greater than the total registered weight of the vehicle and the declared registered capacity thereof and a tolerance of five percent. In a prosecution for a violation of this section, the proper defendant shall be either the owner or lessee of the vehicle, machine, or contrivance or the person who operates the vehicle, machine, or contrivance. This section shall not apply to the operation of a motor truck, tractor, trailer, or other vehicle, machine, or contrivance while being operated strictly in compliance with and in conformity to the provisions of a permit so to do issued by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles as otherwise provided in this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 97

, eff. April 8, 1959;

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. March 25, 1970;

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1983, No. 86

, § 4;

1995, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1409.
Weighing of vehicles.

Any uniformed police officer, having reason to believe that the weight of the vehicle and load is unlawful, may stop such motor vehicles up to one hour for the purpose of determining the weight of said vehicle and load.
If the operator does not wish to submit to the weighing of such vehicle and load by means of portable scales, he or she may demand that such vehicle be weighed at the nearest public scales reasonably available; however, if public scales are not reasonably available, the officer may require the vehicle to be weighed on portable scales.
The officer may demand that the vehicle be weighed at the nearest public scales reasonably available.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 1, 1978;

1983, No. 86

, § 5.

§ 1410.
Removal of overloads.

When the gross weight of such vehicle and load is determined to be at least 10,000 lbs. in excess of the weight limits for such trucks on such highways, the enforcement officer may require that such portion of the load that is found to be in excess of these weights be removed.
(a) (1) When the gross weight of such vehicle and load is determined to be at least 10,000 lbs. in excess of the weight limits for such trucks on such highways, the enforcement officer may require that such portion of the load that is found to be in excess of these weights be removed.

When it is determined that portions of these loads referred to in this section must be removed, the truck may be driven to a suitable place for such removal. The enforcement officer may require that portions be removed onto another motor vehicle.

Dispositions of property referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall be treated under the provisions of section 1413 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 86

, § 6.

§ 1411.
Refusal to weigh vehicle or remove overload.

An operator of a motor truck shall not fail or refuse to stop or submit the vehicle and load to weighing, or fail or refuse when directed by an officer upon weighing of the vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of sections 1409 and 1410 of this title.
A person violating this section or section 1410 shall be fined not less than $500.00 nor more than $2500.00 and, at the time of the violation, the officer may impound the vehicle and have it weighed and after weighing and upon payment of towing charges, the vehicle shall be released or disposed of under the provisions of section 1413 of this title.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1412 of this title, a violator may have sanctions imposed under the provisions of this section and be additionally fined for violation of other weight regulations provided for by this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

1977, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 1, 1978;

1983, No. 86

, § 7.

§ 1412.
Multiple weight violations.

No more than one overweight violation per vehicle shall be written by an enforcement officer at any single incident.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 1, 1978.

§ 1413.
Disposition of impounded vehicles and loads.

Rights of owner of load. The title to the load on an impounded vehicle or combination remains in the owner who may repossess the load at any time upon presentation of proof of ownership to the sheriff. If the load spoils during impoundment the loss shall be on the owner subject to any right of recovery of damages that the owner may have against the owner of the vehicle or combination or against any other party, and the costs of disposition of the load shall be recoverable in addition to the costs of prosecution.

Sale of unclaimed vehicle or load. In case any impounded vehicle or combination is unredeemed, or the load is unclaimed, for a period of 60 days after notice of impoundment is given, it shall be sold at a public sale by the sheriff upon order of the issuing authority and after 10 days notice of sale to the owners, lienholders, or secured parties of the vehicle or load except that if the sheriff determines it to be necessary to preserve their value, goods which may spoil may be sold in any commercially reasonable manner prior to expiration of the 60-day period and, if impractical to do so, without giving notice to the owners, lienholders, or secured parties.

Disposition of proceeds of sale. The proceeds of sale shall first be applied to the payment of the fine and costs, and secondly, to the payment of the encumbrances. The balance shall be remitted to the owner.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 86

, § 9.

§ 1414.
Reciprocal enforcement.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Commissioner make a reasonable effort to reach agreement with the New England states and New York with respect to a uniform size and weight of motor vehicles to be allowed to operate on the public highways of those jurisdictions and Vermont. The agreement should, to the extent possible, find a balance between the free flow of commerce and the safety of the users on the highways.

The Commissioner may enter into agreements with other states, the District of Columbia, and Canadian provinces providing for the reciprocal enforcement of the overweight or over dimension vehicle permit laws of those jurisdictions entering into the agreement. The agreement is allowed to conflict with sections 1400 through 1408 of this title provided that the overall effect of the interstate agreement maintains standards that are generally comparable to those presently in effect in Vermont, in which case the terms of the agreement shall govern as to vehicles issued permits pursuant to the agreement.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 95

, § 1, eff. June 23, 1987; amended

1997, No. 46

, § 4.

§ 1415.
Transfer of weight permits.

Weight permits issued pursuant to this subchapter may be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle. If the permit fee of the motor vehicle for which a permit is sought is less than the permit fee for the transferred motor vehicle, the Commissioner shall certify to the Commissioner of Finance and Management the facts pertinent to the difference of the permit fees, giving the name of the owner of the motor vehicle, his or her address, the amount of the original permit fee paid, the date of application for transfer, and the correct fee for the motor vehicle for which the permit is sought. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrant in favor of the owner for the percent of the difference in permit fees as the unexpired term bears to the entire permit period. If the permit fee for the motor vehicle for which a permit is sought is greater than the permit issued to the transferred vehicle, the permit applicant shall pay the difference based on the prorated term remaining on the permit. If a transfer of the permit is made before the 15th day of any month, the transfer shall be considered as having been made on the first day of the month. If the transfer of a permit is made on or after the 15th day of any month, the transfer shall be considered as having been made on the first day of the month following the application for transfer.

Transfers issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall only be permitted if the applicant or an authorized representative appears at the Department of Motor Vehicles’ office in Montpelier. Such transfers shall be permitted by mail, if the transfer is between vehicles registered at the same weight.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.